Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Chapter 20. Acceptance of Federal Funds.

Sec. 37.20.010.
Acceptance of federal grants and transfers of property.

The governor is authorized to accept on behalf of the state all federal grants and transfers of property of an emergency, transitional, or omnibus nature upon conditions imposed by the federal government.

History.

(§ 1 ch 176 SLA 1959)

Sec. 37.20.020.
Federal Transitional Grants Account. [Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 37.20.030.
Jurisdiction of accepted property.

All chattels accepted under the provisions of AS

37.20.010

are subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Administration for distribution to the appropriate department.

All land accepted under the provisions of AS

37.20.010

is subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Natural Resources.

All public buildings accepted under the provisions of AS

37.20.010

are subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities.

History.

(§§ 3 — 5 ch 176 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 42 SLA 1997)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Administration has primary jurisdiction over the disposal of all chattels owned by the state or any other property which may conveniently be handled separately from the land, without regard to whether it is located on lands under the jurisdiction of the Department of Public Works [now Department of Transportation and Public Facilities] or the Department of Natural Resources, except that in the case of buildings, the ordinary fixtures of the buildings will follow the jurisdiction of the buildings. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 9.

Sec. 37.20.040.
Alaska Native Fund. [Repealed, § 64 ch 14 SLA 1987.]